test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_koccod_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - koččođ: # not checked
    koččođ+V+Inf: koččođ
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kočom
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kočoh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koččo
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: koččoon
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: koččovettee
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: koččov
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: koččop
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: koččovetteđ
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: koččoh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuččum
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuččuh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kočoi
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kočoim
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kočoid
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kočoin
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kočoim
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kočoid
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuččuu
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kočoččim
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kočoččih
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kočoččij
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kočoččáim
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kočoččáid
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kočoččáin
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kočoččijm
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kočoččijd
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kočoččii
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: koččoom
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: koččooh
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: koččooš
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kočožeen
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: koččoošvettee
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kočožává
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kočožep
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: koččoošvetteđ
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kočožeh

    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kočo
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kočos
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du1: koččoon
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du2: koččoo
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du3: koččoos
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: koččoop
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: koččođ
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: koččoos
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kočo
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: koččom
    koččođ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kočoččii
    koččođ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kuččuu
    koččođ+V+PrsPrc: koččoo
    koččođ+V+PrfPrc: koččom
    koččođ+V+Actio+Nom: koččom
    koččođ+V+Actio+Ess: koččomin
    koččođ+V+Actio+Loc: koččomist
    koččođ+V+Actio+Ill: koččomân
    koččođ+V+Actio+Com: kočodijn
    koččođ+V+VAbess: kočohánnáá
